Illinois, session 104th, HB4026.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $300,000 or as much of that amount 5as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Department of Public Health for grants to the Les 7Turner ALS Foundation for research on Amyotrophic Lateral 8Sclerosis.  9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102025.